Florida, session 2026, SB966.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 45 46 Section 1.âSection 465.0199, Florida Statutes, is created 47 to read: 48 465.0199âOutsourcing facility permit; inspection; board 49 authority.â 50 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âThe Legislature finds that 51 outsourcing facilities registered under 21 U.S.C. s. 353b are 52 subject to comprehensive federal inspection and oversight by the 53 United States Food and Drug Administration to ensure the 54 quality, safety, and integrity of compounded drug products. The 55 Legislature further finds that duplicative state and federal 56 inspection regimes, overlapping regulatory requirements, and 57 inconsistent standards among jurisdictions create unnecessary 58 administrative burdens and confusion, thereby diminishing the 59 effectiveness of regulatory oversight. It is the intent of the 60 Legislature to recognize the primacy of federal oversight under 61 21 U.S.C. s. 353b, ensure coordination between federal and state 62 regulatory authorities, and promote efficient regulation of 63 outsourcing facilities while maintaining the protection of the 64 publicâs health, welfare, and safety. 65 (2)âPERMIT REQUIRED.â 66 (a)âAn outsourcing facility as defined in s. 465.003 which 67 is located within this state must apply to the department, using 68 a form prescribed by the board, and obtain an outsourcing 69 facility permit before engaging in the compounding, dispensing, 70 distributing, or other furnishing of compounded drug products 71 within this state or in any jurisdiction outside this state. 72 (b)âThe department shall issue an outsourcing facility 73 permit to an outsourcing facility that the board certifies as 74 meeting the requirements of this chapter and applicable federal 75 law. 76 (c)âAn initial application for an outsourcing facility 77 permit under this section must include documentation of an 78 inspection conducted by the United States Food and Drug 79 Administration demonstrating compliance with all current federal 80 good manufacturing practices. In reviewing such documentation, 81 the board shall also consider any corrective actions taken by 82 the outsourcing facility in response to observations noted by 83 the United States Food and Drug Administration. The department 84 may not issue an initial permit to an outsourcing facility that 85 has not been inspected by the United States Food and Drug 86 Administration. 87 (d)âAn outsourcing facility that does not engage in 88 patient-specific sterile compounding and dispensing pursuant to 89 a prescription is only required to obtain an outsourcing 90 facility permit. However, if the outsourcing facility engages in 91 patient-specific sterile compounding, it must also obtain the 92 appropriate pharmacy permit corresponding to the type of 93 dispensing conducted, such as a community pharmacy permit or an 94 institutional pharmacy permit. 95 (e)âThis subsection applies only to an outsourcing facility 96 that submits an initial application for an outsourcing facility 97 permit on or after July 1, 2026. An outsourcing facility that 98 holds a valid outsourcing facility permit issued by the 99 department before July 1, 2026, is deemed to be in compliance 100 with the permitting requirements of this subsection and may 101 continue to operate under such permit until its expiration, 102 renewal, suspension, or revocation in accordance with this 103 chapter. 104 (3)âINSPECTION.â 105 (a)âFor both initial permitting and renewal, the board and 106 the department shall rely upon and recognize the outsourcing 107 facilityâs most recent inspection report issued by the United 108 States Food and Drug Administration as satisfying any state 109 inspection requirement. For initial licensure, a preoperational 110 inspection by the United States Food and Drug Administration 111 demonstrating compliance with current good manufacturing 112 practices, together with any corrective actions taken by the 113 facility in response to observations by the United States Food 114 and Drug Administration, satisfies the state inspection 115 requirement. 116 (b)âThe department may conduct an inspection for cause upon 117 receipt of credible evidence of noncompliance or to verify the 118 implementation of corrective actions related to federal 119 findings. 120 (4)âBOARD AUTHORITY.â 121 (a)âThe board is the sole state regulatory authority 122 responsible for the permitting, oversight, and discipline of 123 outsourcing facilities under this section. 124 (b)âAn outsourcing facility permitted under this section is 125 exempt from separate licensure or permitting required under part 126 I of chapter 499 for those activities that fall within the scope 127 of an outsourcing facility pursuant to 21 U.S.C. s. 353b and the 128 Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. ss. 301 et seq. 129 (5)âRULEMAKING.âThe board shall adopt rules to implement 130 this section, including, but not limited to, procedures for 131 application, renewal, and recognition of federal inspection 132 documentation. 133 Section 2.âSubsection (8) is added to section 499.002, 134 Florida Statutes, to read: 135 499.002âPurpose, administration, and enforcement of and 136 exemption from this part.â 137 (8)âThis part does not apply to an outsourcing facility 138 that holds a valid outsourcing facility permit issued under s. 139 465.0199 for activities conducted within the scope of such 140 permit pursuant to 21 U.S.C. s. 353b and the Federal Food, Drug, 141 and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. ss. 301 et seq. 142 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.